Oklahoma, session 2025, SB355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 142.2, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 118, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 142.2), is amended to read as follows:


Section 142.2. As used in the Oklahoma Underground Facilities


Damage Prevention Act:


1. “Certified project” means a project where the public agency


responsible for the public project, in consultation with the


statewide one-call notification center, as part of its procedure,


certifies that the project right-of-way is free and clear of


underground facilities or wherein the public agency responsible for


such project, as part of its procedure, notifies all persons

Req. No. 762 Page 1


determined by the public agency to have underground facilities


located within the construction right-of-way and certifies that all


known underground facilities are duly located or noted on the


engineering drawings for the project;


2. “Damage” means any impact upon or removal of support from an


underground facility as a result of explosion, excavation, or


demolition which according to the operating practices of the


operator of the underground facilities would necessitate the repair


thereof;


3. “Demolish” means to wreck, raze, render, move, or remove a


structure by means of any equipment or explosive;


4. “Demolition” means the act or operation of demolishing a


structure;


5. “Excavate” means to dig, compress, or remove earth, rock, or


other materials in or on the ground by use of mechanized equipment


or blasting, including, but not necessarily limited to, augering,


boring, backfilling, drilling, grading, pile driving, plowing in,


pulling in, trenching, tunneling, and plowing; provided, however,


that neither:


a. the moving of earth by tools manipulated only by human


or animal power, except in a private or public


easement or right-of-way,


b. the moving of earth by tools manipulated only by human


power for burying communication lines of a

Req. No. 762 Page 2


communications provider in a private or public


easement or right-of-way when depth is not greater


than twelve (12) inches and within twelve (12) inches


of a communications provider terminal,


c. any form of cultivation for agricultural purposes, nor


any augering, dozing by noncommercial dozer operators,


or digging for postholes, farm ponds, land clearing,


or other normal agricultural purposes,


d. routine maintenance,


e. work by a public agency or its contractors on a


preengineered project,


f. work on a certified project,


g. work on a permitted project,


h. the opening of a grave in a cemetery,


i. a solid waste disposal site which is a preengineered


project, nor


j. any individual excavating on his or her own property


and who is not in the excavating business for hire,


except in a private or public easement or right-of-


way,


shall be deemed excavation;


6. “Excavation” means the act or operation of excavating;


7. “Excavator” means a person or public agency that intends to


excavate or demolish within this state;

Req. No. 762 Page 3


8. “Notification center” means the statewide center currently


known as the Oklahoma One-Call System, Inc., which has as one of its


purposes to receive notification of planned excavation and


demolition in a specified area from excavators, and to disseminate


such notification of planned excavation or demolition to operators


who are members and participants;


9. “Operator” shall mean and include any person or public


agency owning or operating underground facilities;


10. “Permitted project” means a project where a permit for the


work to be performed must be issued by a state or federal agency


and, as a prerequisite to receiving such permit, the applicant must


locate all underground facilities in the area of the work and in the


vicinity of any blasting and notify each owner of such underground


facilities;


11. “Person” includes any individual, partnership, corporation,


association, cooperative, trust, or other entity, including a person


engaged as a contractor by a public agency, but not including a


public agency;


12. “Preengineered project” means a public project wherein the


public agency responsible for such project, as part of its


engineering and contract procedures, holds a meeting prior to the


commencement of any construction work on such project in which all


persons, determined by the public agency, in consultation with the


statewide one-call notification center, to have underground

Req. No. 762 Page 4


facilities located within the construction area of the project are


invited to attend and given an opportunity to verify or inform the


public agency of the location of their underground facilities, if


any, within the construction area and where the location of all


known underground facilities are duly located or noted on the


engineering drawing and specifications for the project;


13. “Public agency” means the this state, or any board,


commission, or agency of the this state, or a county of this state;


14. “Routine maintenance” means the grading of roads and barrow


or drainage ditches, the removal and replacement of pavement,


including excavation relating thereto, and the installation and


maintenance of drainage and bridge facilities, signs, guardrails,


and electrical and communications facilities in or on the public


rights-of-way by a public agency;


15. “Underground facility” means any underground line, cable,


facility, system, and appurtenances thereto, for producing, storing,


conveying, transmitting, or distributing communication (including


voice, video, or data information), electricity, power, light, heat,


intrastate and interstate gas pipelines, as described in 49 CFR


C.F.R., Part 192.1, intrastate and interstate hazardous liquid or


carbon dioxide pipelines, as described in 49 CFR C.F.R., Part 195.1,


water (including storm water), steam, sewage, and other commodities,


and any oil and gas pipeline located in a private or public easement


or right-of-way;

Req. No. 762 Page 5


16. “Design” or “survey” means a notice to facility operators


to provide underground facility information during the design or


engineering phase of a project to mitigate potential impact to


existing underground facilities;


17. “Watch and protect” means an operator or its designated


representative is present to observe an excavation within ten (10)


feet of the operator’s marking of its existing underground facility;


18. “Pre-excavation meeting request” means a notice to


underground facility operators to participate in scheduled meetings


for the purpose of planning large projects and coordinate resources


accordingly; and


19. “Large projects” are those excavation projects that involve


one of the following:


a. exceeds distances defined in paragraph 5 of subsection


D of Section 142.6 of this title, or


b. estimated duration is more than ninety (90) days.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-762 MSBB 1/3/2025 4:23:42 PM











Req. No. 762 Page 6